Washington statutes.
RCW 41.41.030

Effective date for coverage of members.

The effective date of OASI coverage for state employee members of the state employees' retirement system shall be the 1st day of July, 1957; provided the terms and conditions set forth in RCW 41.48.030(3) have been fulfilled.

[ 1957 c 222 s 3.]